Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-1214
Treatment order of mental health board; appeal; final order of district court; appeal.

The subject of a petition or the county attorney may appeal a treatment order of the mental health board under section 71-1209 to the district court. Such appeals shall be de novo on the record. A final order of the district court may be appealed to the Court of Appeals in accordance with the procedure in criminal cases. The final judgment of the court shall be certified to and become a part of the records of the mental health board with respect to the subject.

Laws 2006, LB 1199, § 70.